Idaho, session 2026, H0652.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The Legislature finds that
the State of Idaho values the rights to hunt, fish, and trap and has enshrined
such rights in the Constitution of the State of Idaho. The Legislature finds
that the sport of hunting is historically and culturally representative of
these traditions. As such, it is the intent of the Legislature to designate
and declare hunting as the state sport of the State of Idaho.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 45, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-4517, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-4517. STATE SPORT DESIGNATED. Hunting is hereby designated and de-
clared to be the state sport of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.